Hawaii statutes.
§326-26 Persons allowed at places for
Hansen's disease patients. (a) No person, not having Hansen's disease,
shall be allowed to visit or remain upon any land, place, or inclosure set
apart by the department of health for the domiciles and community facilities of
persons affected with Hansen's disease, without the written permission of the
director of health, or some officer authorized thereto by the department, under
any circumstances whatever, and any person found upon such land, place, or
inclosure without a written permission shall be fined not less than $10 nor
more than $100 for such offense; provided that any patient resident of
Kalaupapa desiring to remain at the facility shall be permitted to do so for as
long as the person may choose, regardless of whether the person has been
successfully treated.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), upon the
request of a patient, the non-patient-spouse of a patient residing at Kalaupapa
shall be allowed to reside with the patient-spouse at Kalaupapa. The non-patient-spouse
shall not be entitled to receive any services or benefits accorded specifically
to Hansen's disease patients at Kalaupapa. [L 1870, c 33, pt of §1; am L 1903,
c 8, §2; RL 1925, §1201; am L 1931, c 139, §5; am L 1933, c 118, §1; RL 1935,
§1164; RL 1945, §2427; am L 1949, c 53, §19; RL 1955, §50-28; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §19; HRS §326-26; am L 1969, c 152, §1; am L 1977, c 25, §3; am L 1981, c
185, §13; am L 1982, c 147, §16; am L 1985, c 250, §11; am L 1996, c 2, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next